Wisconsin, session 2025, AB828.
do enact as follows:AB828,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB828,26Section 2. 20.255 (3) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB828,2,8720.255 (3) (cm) School counseling grants. The amounts in the schedule for 8grants to school counselors under s. 115.448.AB828,39Section 3. 115.448 of the statutes is created to read:AB828,2,1310115.448 School counseling grants. (1) In this section, “school counselor” 11means an individual who holds a license issued by the department under s. PI 1234.059, Wis. Adm. Code, and is required to hold that license for purposes of the 13individual’s employment.AB828,2,1614(2) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, the department shall develop and 15implement a program to award grants to school counselors for the costs of 16continuing education and training in mental and behavioral health.AB828,2,1817(3) The department shall promulgate rules to implement and administer this 18section.AB828,2,1919